Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,104
Accidents; body fluid; samples; test; report.

All samples and tests of body fluids under sections 60-6,101 to 60-6,103 shall be submitted to and performed by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the Department of Health and Human Services for such purpose. Such tests shall be performed according to methods approved by the department. Such individual shall promptly perform such analysis and report the results thereof to the official submitting the sample.

Laws 1974, LB 66, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.09;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 200;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 282;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 232.